Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,101
Costs of transporting juvenile to department; payment by county; when.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to section 43-290, each county shall bear all the expenses incident to the transportation of each juvenile from such county to the Department of Health and Human Services, together with such fees and costs as are allowed by law in similar cases. The fees, costs, and expenses shall be paid from the county treasury upon itemized vouchers certified by the judge of the juvenile court.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 57;

Laws 1987, LB 638, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 148.